New Mexico, session 2026, HB210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Four million eight hundred thirteen thousand dollars ($4,813,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the health care authority for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to encourage health care facilities to exchange health care information with the nonprofit organization designated by the state to operate the New Mexico health information exchange and to provide those health care facilities with subscriptions to the health information exchange. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -